Hawaii statutes.
[§453-18] Pelvic examinations on
anesthetized or unconscious female patients. A physician, osteopathic
physician, surgeon, or student participating in a course of instruction,
residency program, or clinical training program shall not perform a pelvic examination
on an anesthetized or unconscious female patient unless:

(1) The patient gives prior verbal or written
informed consent to the pelvic examination;

(2) The performance of a pelvic examination is within
the scope of care for the surgical procedure or diagnostic examination
scheduled to be performed on the patient; or

(3) The patient is unconscious and the pelvic
examination is required for diagnostic purposes. [L 2012, c 136, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next